Alabama, session 2026rs, HB35.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) Except as otherwise provided in
subsection (b), it shall be unlawful for any person to operate
a passenger car or truck, as defined under Section 32-1-1.1,
Code of Alabama 1975, on the highways of this state if, by
alteration of the suspension, frame, or chassis, the height of
the front fender is raised four or more inches greater than
the height of the accompanying rear fender. For purposes of
Page 1

the height of the accompanying rear fender. For purposes of
HB35 INTRODUCED
this section, the height of the fender shall be a vertical
measurement from and perpendicular to the ground, through the
centerline of the wheel, and to the bottom of the fender.
(b) This section does not apply to any vehicle
modification or alteration made for bona fide commercial or
agricultural purposes.
(c) A person who violates this section shall be guilty
of a violation and shall be punished as follows:
(1) On a first conviction, a fine of not more than
fifty dollars ($50).
(2) On a second conviction, a fine of not more than one
hundred dollars ($100).
(3) On a third or subsequent conviction, a fine of two
hundred fifty dollars ($250).
(d) For purposes of determining whether a prior
conviction has occurred under this section, the court shall
only consider offenses that occurred within the preceding five
years of the current offense.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2